Maryland, session 2026, HB0972.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
SUBTITLE 22. MARYLAND FAIR AND AGRICULTURAL EDUCATION PROMISE FUND.
10–2201.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “FUND” MEANS THE MARYLAND FAIR AND AGRICULTURAL
EDUCATION PROMISE FUND.
10–2202.
(A) THERE IS A MARYLAND FAIR AND AGRICULTURAL EDUCATION
PROMISE FUND.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE GRANTS THAT ADVANCE
AGRICULTURAL FAIRS AND EDUCATION IN THE STATE.
(C) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(D) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 163
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(E) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER § 9–120(B)(1)(XV)
OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE;
(2) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(3) (2) INTEREST EARNINGS; AND
(4) (3) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED
FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY:
(1) TO PROVIDE ANNUAL GRANTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 10–2203
OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(2) FOR ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES OF THE COMPTROLLER IN
CARRYING OUT THIS SUBTITLE.
(G) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(H) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(I) FOR EACH FISCAL YEAR, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $200,000 TO THE FUND.
10–2203.
EACH YEAR, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL PAY FROM THE FUND AN ANNUAL
GRANT OF:
(1) $825,000 TO THE MARYLAND AGRICULTURAL FAIR BOARD TO
PROMOTE AND ENHANCE STATE AND COUNTY AGRICULTURAL FAIRS AND EXHIBITS;
– 3 –

Ch. 163 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) (1) $75,000 $100,000 TO THE MARYLAND AGRICULTURAL
EDUCATION FOUNDATION, INC., TO PROMOTE AND ENHANCE STATEWIDE
AGRICULTURAL EDUCATION; AND
(3) $550,000 TO THE MARYLAND STATE FAIR AND AGRICULTURAL
SOCIETY, INC., TO:
(I) PROMOTE AND ENHANCE THE STATE AGRICULTURAL FAIR;
AND
(II) MAINTAIN AND DEVELOP YOUTH AGRICULTURAL
PROGRAMS, WITH SUBSTANTIAL FUNDING PROVIDED TO ORGANIZATIONS,
INCLUDING 4–H CLUBS AND THE MARYLAND FFA ASSOCIATION, FOR THE
PROVISION OF RECOGNITION AND AWARDS; AND
(4) (2) $50,000 $100,000 TO THE MARYLAND FFA ASSOCIATION
FOR AGRICULTURAL EDUCATION AND CAREER DEVELOPMENT.
Article – Business Regulation
11–403.
(a) The Comptroller shall pay from the Special Fund an annual grant of:
(1) [$825,000 to the Maryland Agricultural Fair Board to promote State
and county agricultural fairs and exhibits;
(2)] $100,000 to Prince George’s County to replace money formerly received
from the admissions and amusement tax;
[(3)] (2) $40,000 to the Great Frederick Fair to support exhibition
harness racing with money for construction and maintenance of new stalls, track
maintenance, and purses;
[(4)] (3) $50 to the City of Bowie for each day that the training facilities
are open at the Bowie Race Course Training Center;
[(5) $75,000 to the Maryland Agricultural Education Foundation, Inc., to
promote and enhance statewide agricultural education;]
[(6)] (4) (5) an amount not to exceed $30,000 in fiscal year 1998 and $20,000
in each fiscal year thereafter to the Great Pocomoke Fair, Inc. to support exhibition harness
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 163
racing with money for construction and maintenance of new stalls, track maintenance, and
purses;
[(7)] (5) (6) $500,000 to the Maryland Million, Ltd. to support and promote
the running of Maryland Million races;
[(8)] (6) (7) $350,000 to the Maryland Standardbred Race Fund for the Sire
Stakes Program; and
[(9)] (7) (8) beginning July 1, 2017, from the money distributed under §
9–120(b) of the State Government Article up to $500,000 to a purse for the Maryland
International thoroughbred race under § 11–522.1 of this title.
(b) (1) In fiscal year 2017, the Comptroller shall pay, from the money
distributed to the Special Fund, $500,000 to the Maryland Racing Commission to be used,
in a manner determined by the Maryland Racing Commission, for a bonus award program
for Maryland–bred or Maryland–sired horses running in the Preakness Stakes.
(2) The Maryland Racing Commission shall consult with representatives of
the thoroughbred racing industry prior to establishing the rules and criteria for the bonus
award program.
(3) If, under the rules of the bonus award program, funds remain in the
program after the Preakness Stakes is conducted on one or more occasions, remaining funds
shall carry over to the next fiscal year and may not revert to the General Fund.
(c) [If the Maryland State Fair remains at the Timonium Fair Grounds, the
Comptroller shall pay from the Special Fund an annual grant of:
(1) $500,000 to the Maryland State Fair and Agricultural Society, Inc., to:
(i) promote and enhance the Maryland State Fair; and
(ii) maintain and develop youth programs, with premium money
provided to organizations, such as 4–H Clubs and the Future Farmers of America, for
recognition and awards; and
(2) $50,000 to Baltimore County to replace the money formerly received by
the county under this subtitle.
(d)] Any amounts paid by the Comptroller for the purposes specified under
subsections [(a)(9)] (A)(7) (A)(8) and (b) of this section shall remain available for those
purposes and may not be used for any other purpose.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
– 5 –

Ch. 163 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund; AND
214. THE MARYLAND FAIR AND AGRICULTURAL
EDUCATION PROMISE FUND.
Article – State Government
9–120.
(a) The Comptroller shall distribute, or cause to be distributed, the State Lottery
Fund to pay:
(1) on a pro rata basis for the daily and nondaily State lottery games, the
expenses of administering and operating the State lottery, as authorized under this subtitle
and the State budget; and
(2) then, except as provided in § 10–113.1 of the Family Law Article, §
11–618 of the Criminal Procedure Article, and § 3–307 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article, the holder of each winning ticket or share.
(b) (1) By the end of the month following collection, the Comptroller shall
deposit, cause to be deposited, or pay:
(xiv) subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection after June 30, 2025,
supplemental local impact aid of $250,000 each fiscal year from the proceeds of the Racetrax
lottery game to Anne Arundel County, Howard County, and the City of Laurel in proportion
to each jurisdiction’s share of the money required to be paid under § 11–404(d) of the
Business Regulation Article to be used in accordance with paragraph (4) of this subsection;
[and]
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 163
(XV) AFTER JUNE 30, 2026, INTO THE MARYLAND FAIR AND
AGRICULTURAL EDUCATION PROMISE FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 10–2202 OF
THE AGRICULTURE ARTICLE FROM THE MONEY THAT REMAINS IN THE STATE
LOTTERY FUND FROM THE PROCEEDS OF ALL LOTTERIES AFTER THE
DISTRIBUTIONS UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION AND ITEMS (I) THROUGH
(XIV) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO $1,450,000 IN EACH FISCAL YEAR;
AND
[(xv)] (XVI) into the General Fund of the State the money that remains
in the State Lottery Fund from the proceeds of all lotteries after the distributions under
subsection (a) of this section and items (i) through [(xiv)] (XV) of this paragraph.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 7 –